hu: Elektronika > Hang > Hanglejátszók és -felvevők > Kézi lejátszók és felvevők: Hordozható CD-lejátszók; Hordozható kazettás lejátszók; Hordozható digitális audio-lejátszók; Hordozható MiniDisc-lejátszók; Hordozható hang- és terepi felvevők
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 音频 > 音频播放器与录音机 > 手持播放机/刻录机: 便携式 CD 播放器; 便携式磁带播放器; 便携式数字音频播放器; 便携式 MD 播放器; 便携式录音机和现场录音机
nl: Elektronica > Audio > Audiospelers en -recorders > Draagbare spelers en recorders: Draagbare cd-spelers; Draagbare cassettespelers; Draagbare digitale audiospelers; Draagbare minidisc spelers; Draagbare spraak en veld recorders
hr-HR: Elektronika > Audio > Uređaji za snimanje i reproduciranje zvuka > Ručni uređaji za reprodukciju i snimanje zvuka: Prijenosni CD playeri; Prijenosni kasetofoni; Prijenosni digitalni audioplayeri; Prijenosni MiniDisc playeri; Prijenosni diktafoni
sk-SK: Elektronika > Zvukové zariadenia > Audio prehrávače a rekordéry > Prehrávače a rekordéry do ruky: Prenosné CD prehrávače; Prenosné kazetové prehrávače; Prenosné digitálne audio prehrávače; Prenosné MiniDisc prehrávače; Prenosné hlasové a terénne rekordéry
lt-LT: Elektronika > Garsas > Garso grotuvai ir įrašymo įrenginiai > Rankiniai garso grotuvai ir įrašymo įrenginiai: Nešiojami CD grotuvai; Nešiojami kasečių grotuvai; Nešiojamieji skaitmeniniai garso grotuvai; Nešiojami minidiskų grotuvai; Nešiojami garso ir aplinkos įrašųmo įrenginiai
es: Electrónica > Audio > Reproducción y grabación de sonido > Reproductores y grabadoras portátiles: Reproductores de CD portátiles; Reproductores de casete portátiles; Reproductores de audio digital portátiles; Reproductores de MiniDisc portátiles; Grabadores de voz y de campo portátiles
ja: 電子機器 > オーディオ > 録音・再生機器 > ハンドヘルドプレーヤー・レコーダー: ポータブルCDプレーヤー; ポータブルカセットプレーヤー; ポータブルデジタルオーディオプレーヤー; ポータブルミニディスクプレーヤー; ポータブルボイス・フィールドレコーダー
fi: Elektroniikka > Audio > Äänentoisto ja äänitys > Kannettavat soittimet ja -nauhurit: Kannettava CD-soitin; Kannettava kasettisoitin; Kannettava digitaalinen äänisoitin; Kannettava MiniDisc-soitin; Kannettava ääni- ja kenttätallennin
en: Electronics > Audio > Audio Players & Recorders > Handheld Players & Recorders: Portable CD Players; Portable Cassette Players; Portable Digital Audio Players; Portable MiniDisc Players; Portable Voice & Field Recorders
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 音訊設備 > 音訊播放機/錄音機 > 手持播放機和錄音機: 攜帶式 CD 播放器; 攜帶式卡帶播放機; 攜帶式數位音訊播放器; 攜帶式 MiniDisc 播放器; 攜帶式語音及現場錄音機
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > เสียง > เครื่องเล่นและบันทึกเสียง > เครื่องเล่นและบันทึกพกพา: เครื่องเล่น CD แบบพกพา; เครื่องเล่นเทปแบบพกพา; เครื่องเล่นเสียงดิจิทัลแบบพกพา; เครื่องเล่นมินิดิสก์แบบพกพา; เครื่องบันทึกเสียงและภาคสนามแบบพกพา
ko: 전자기기 > 오디오 > 오디오 플레이어/녹음기 > 휴대용 재생기/녹음기: 휴대용 CD 플레이어; 휴대용 카세트 플레이어; 휴대용 디지털 오디오 플레이어; 휴대용 미니디스크 플레이어; 휴대용 음성 및 필드 레코더
nb: Elektronikk > Lyd > Lydavspillere og -opptakere > Håndholdte spillere og opptakere: Bærbare CD-spillere; Bærbare kassettspillere; Bærbare digitale lydavspillere; Bærbare MiniDisc-spillere; Bærbare stemme- og feltopptakere
da: Elektronik > Lyd > Lydafspillere og -optagere > Håndholdte afspillere og optagere: Bærbare CD-afspillere; Bærbare kassetteafspillere; Bærbare digitale lydafspillere; Bærbare MiniDisc-afspillere; Bærbare stemme- og feltoptagere
de: Elektronik > Audio > Audioplayer & -rekorder > Tragbare Player und -Recorder: Tragbare CD-Player; Tragbare Kassettenspieler; Tragbare digitale Audio-Player; Tragbare MiniDisc-Player; Tragbare Stimm- und Feldrekorder
it: Elettronica > Audio > Lettori e registratori audio > Lettori e registratori portatili: Lettori CD portatili; Lettori a cassetta portatili; Lettori audio digitali portatili; Lettori MiniDisc portatili; Registratori portatili di voce e campo
cs: Elektronika > Zvuk > Přehrávače a záznamníky zvuku > Ruční přehrávače a rekordéry: Přenosné CD přehrávače; Přenosné kazetové přehrávače; Přenosné digitální audio přehrávače; Přenosné přehrávače MiniDisc; Přenosné hlasové a terénní rekordéry
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Âm thanh > Máy nghe nhạc & Máy thu âm > Máy phát & Máy ghi âm cầm tay: Máy phát CD di động; Máy phát cassette di động; Máy phát âm thanh kỹ thuật số di động; Máy phát MiniDisc di động; Máy ghi giọng nói và thực địa di động
sl-SI: Elektronika > Avdio > Zvočni predvajalniki in snemalniki > Ročni predvajalniki in snemalniki: Prenosni CD predvajalniki; Prenosni kasetofoni; Prenosni digitalni avdio predvajalniki; Prenosni MiniDisc predvajalniki; Prenosni diktafoni in terenski snemalniki
tr: Elektronik > Ses > Ses Çalar ve Kaydediciler > Taşınabilir Oynatıcılar ve Kaydediciler: Taşınabilir CD Çalarlar; Taşınabilir Kaset Çalarlar; Taşınabilir Dijital Ses Oynatıcıları; Taşınabilir MiniDisc Çalarlar; Taşınabilir Ses ve Alan Kayıt Cihazları
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Ήχος > Συσκευές αναπαραγωγής & εγγραφής ήχου > Φορητοί Players (αναπαραγωγείς) & Recorders (συσκευές εγγραφής): Φορητές συσκευές αναπαραγωγής CD; Φορητές συσκευές αναπαραγωγής κασετών; Φορητές ψηφιακές συσκευές αναπαραγωγής ήχου; Φορητές συσκευές αναπαραγωγής MiniDisc; Φορητές συσκευές εγγραφής φωνής & πεδίου
sv: Elektronik > Ljud > Ljuduppspelare och inspelningsutrustning > Handhållna spelare och inspelare: Bärbara cd-spelare; Bärbara kassettspelare; Bärbara digitala ljudspelare; Bärbara minidisc-spelare; Bärbara röst- och fältinspelare
pl: Elektronika > Audio > Odtwarzacze i nagrywarki audio > Przenośne odtwarzacze i nagrywarki: Przenośne odtwarzacze CD; Przenośne magnetofony kasetowe; Przenośne cyfrowe odtwarzacze audio; Przenośne odtwarzacze MiniDisc; Przenośne rejestratory głosu i terenowe
fr: Appareil électronique > Audio > Lecteurs et enregistreurs audio > Lecteurs et enregistreurs portables: Lecteurs CD portables; Lecteurs de cassettes portables; Lecteurs audio numériques portables; Lecteurs MiniDisc portables; Enregistreurs vocaux et de terrain portables
bg-BG: Електроника > Aудио > Аудиоплейъри и записващи устройства > Ръчни плейъри и записващи устройства: Преносими CD плейъри; Преносими касетофони; Преносими цифрови аудио плейъри; Преносими MiniDisc плейъри; Преносими диктофони и полеви рекордери
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Áudio > Players e gravadores de áudio > Reprodutores e gravadores portáteis: CD players portáteis; Toca-fitas portáteis; Players de áudio digitais portáteis; MiniDisc players portáteis; Gravadores de voz e de campo portáteis
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Áudio > Leitores e gravadores áudio > Leitores e gravadores portáteis: Leitores de CD portáteis; Leitores de cassetes portáteis; Leitores de áudio digital portáteis; Leitores de minidisc portáteis; Gravadores de voz e de campo portáteis
ru: Электроника > Аудиотехника > Устройства для воспроизведения и записи звука > Портативные проигрыватели и рекордеры: Портативные CD-плееры; Портативные кассетные плееры; Портативные цифровые аудиоплееры; Портативные MiniDisc-плееры; Портативные диктофоны и рекордеры
ro-RO: Electronice > Audio > Aparate de redare și de înregistrare audio > Aparate portabile de redare și de înregistrare: Playere CD portabile; Casetofoane portabile; Playere audio digitale portabile; Playere MiniDisc portabile; Reportofoane și înregistratoare de teren portabile